Maryland, session 2026, HB1383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–816.1.
(b) (1) In a hearing conducted in accordance with § 3–815, § 3–817, § 3–819, or
§ 3–823 of this subtitle, the court shall make a finding whether the local department made
reasonable efforts to prevent placement of the child into the local department’s custody.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1383*

HOUSE BILL 1383
(2) In a review hearing conducted in accordance with § 3–823 of this
subtitle or § 5–326 of the Family Law Article, the court shall make a finding whether a
local department made reasonable efforts to:
(i) Finalize the permanency plan in effect for the child;
(ii) Meet the INDIVIDUALIZED needs of the child, including the
child’s [health, education, safety, and preparation]:
1. HEALTH, MEDICAL, AND DENTAL NEEDS INCLUDING
ENSURING THAT THE NEEDS ARE TIMELY MET;
2. EDUCATION NEEDS AND EDUCATIONAL PLAN,
INCLUDING THE TIMELY ENROLLMENT OF THE CHILD IN AN EDUCATIONAL
PROGRAM AND THE EFFORTS TO INFORM THE CHILD OF POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION OR VOCATIONAL PROGRAMS;
3. SAFETY;
4. EMOTIONAL STABILITY AND THE TIMELINESS OF
THERAPEUTIC REFERRALS OR SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE CHILD;
5. PHYSICAL PLACEMENT, INCLUDING THE STABILITY
AND APPROPRIATENESS OF THE PLACEMENT AND HOUSING NEEDS OF THE CHILD
AFTER THE CASE IS TERMINATED;
6. SOCIALIZATION NEEDS, INCLUDING THE CHILD’S
ENROLLMENT IN EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES OR PROGRAMS;
7. FINANCIAL NEEDS, INCLUDING THE CHILD’S NEED
FOR FINANCIAL AWARENESS TO ENSURE FUTURE SELF–SUFFICIENCY;
8. NECESSARY DOCUMENTS, INCLUDING THE CHILD’S
BIRTH CERTIFICATE, SOCIAL SECURITY CARD, PASSPORT, DRIVER’S LICENSE, OR
STATE–ISSUED IDENTIFICATION CARD; AND
9. PREPARATION for independence; and
(iii) For a child who is at least 18 years of age:
1. Before the child is emancipated, enroll the child in health
insurance that will continue after the child is emancipated;
2. Before the child is emancipated, screen the child for
eligibility for public benefits and assist the child with applications for public benefits;

HOUSE BILL 1383 3
3. Work with appropriate individuals to establish a plan for
stable housing that is reasonably expected to remain available to the child for at least 12
months after the date of emancipation; and
4. Work with appropriate individuals to engage the child in
education, training, or employment activities that will prepare the child to have
appropriate and sufficient income to live independently after emancipation.
(3) In a hearing conducted in accordance with § 3–815, § 3–817, or § 3–819
of this subtitle, before determining whether a child with a developmental disability or a
mental illness is a child in need of assistance, the court shall make a finding whether the
local department made reasonable efforts to prevent placement of the child into the local
department’s custody by determining whether the local department could have placed the
child in accordance with a voluntary placement agreement under § 5–525(b)(1)(i) or (iii) of
the Family Law Article.
(4) The court shall require a local department to provide evidence of its
efforts before the court makes a finding required under this subsection.
(5) The court’s finding under this subsection shall assess the efforts made
since the last adjudication of reasonable efforts and may not rely on findings from prior
hearings.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.